West Virginia, session 2026, SB1034.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9A. PUBLIC SCHOOL SUPPORT. §18-9A-25a. Foundation allowance for loss of funding for certain students not enrolled in public schools and not a recipient of a Hope Scholarship. If a student is not enrolled in a public school, and is eligible to be a recipient of a Hope Scholarship as provided in §18-31-1 et seq. of this code and elects not to take the scholarship, the county board of education in which the student resides shall receive funding from the Hope Scholarship Program Fund equal to the amount the county board would receive for that student if he or she were enrolled in a public school or education program in the county.